Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
SUBCHAPTER 32. The Kentucky Business Investment Program

154.32-010.
Definitions for subchapter.

“Activation date” means the date established in the tax incentive agreement that is within two (2) years of final approval;

“Affiliate” means the following:

Members of a family, including only brothers and sisters of the whole or half blood, spouse, ancestors, and lineal descendants of an individual;

An individual, and a corporation more than fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock of which is owned, directly or indirectly, by or for that individual;

An individual, and a limited liability company of which more than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest or profits are owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by or for that individual;

Two (2) corporations which are members of the same controlled group, which includes and is limited to:

One (1) or more chains of corporations connected through stock ownership with a common parent corporation if:

Stock possessing more than fifty percent (50%) of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock entitled to vote or more than fifty percent (50%) of the total value of shares of all classes of stock of each of the corporations, except the common parent corporation, is owned by one (1) or more of the other corporations; and

The common parent corporation owns stock possessing more than fifty percent (50%) of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock entitled to vote or more than fifty percent (50%) of the total value of shares of all classes of stock of at least one (1) of the other corporations, excluding, in computing the voting power or value, stock owned directly by the other corporations; or

Two (2) or more corporations if five (5) or fewer persons who are individuals, estates, or trusts own stock possessing more than fifty percent (50%) of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock entitled to vote or more than fifty percent (50%) of the total value of shares of all classes of stock of each corporation, taking into account the stock ownership of each person only to the extent the stock ownership is identical with respect to each corporation;

A grantor and a fiduciary of any trust;

A fiduciary of a trust and a fiduciary of another trust, if the same person is a grantor of both trusts;

A fiduciary of a trust and a beneficiary of that trust;

A fiduciary of a trust and a beneficiary of another trust, if the same person is a grantor of both trusts;

A fiduciary of a trust and a corporation more than fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock of which is owned, directly or indirectly, by or for the trust or by or for a person who is a grantor of the trust;

A fiduciary of a trust and a limited liability company more than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest, or the interest in profits, of which is owned directly or indirectly, by or for the trust or by or for a person who is a grantor of the trust;

A corporation, a partnership, or a limited partnership if the same persons own:

More than fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock of the corporation; and

More than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest, or the profits interest, in the partnership or limited partnership;

A corporation and a limited liability company if the same persons own:

More than fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock of the corporation; and

More than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest or the profits in the limited liability company;

A partnership or limited partnership and a limited liability company if the same persons own:

More than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest or profits in the partnership or limited partnership; and

More than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest or the profits in the limited liability company;

An S corporation and another S corporation if the same persons own more than fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock of each corporation; S corporation designation being the same as that designation under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;

An S corporation and a C corporation, if the same persons own more than fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock of each corporation; S and C corporation designations being the same as those designations under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; or

Two (2) or more limited liability companies, if the same persons own more than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest or are entitled to more than fifty percent (50%) of the capital profits in the limited liability companies;

“Agribusiness” means the processing of raw agricultural products, including but not limited to timber and industrial hemp, or the performance of value-added functions with regard to raw agricultural products;

“Alternative fuel production” means a Kentucky operation that primarily produces alternative transportation fuels for sale. The alternative fuel production may produce electricity as a by-product if the primary function of the operations remains the production and sale of alternative transportation fuels;

“Alternative transportation fuels” has the same meaning as in KRS 152.715;

“Approved company” means an eligible company that has received final approval to receive incentives under this subchapter;

“Approved costs” means the amount of eligible costs approved by the authority at final approval;

“Authority” means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority established by KRS 154.20-010;

“Biomass resources” has the same meaning as in KRS 152.715;

“Capital lease” means a lease classified as a capital lease by the Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 13, Accounting for Leases, issued by the Financial Accounting Standards Board, November 1976, as amended;

“Carbon dioxide transmission pipeline” means the in-state portion of a pipeline, including appurtenant facilities, property rights, and easements, that is used exclusively for the purpose of transporting carbon dioxide to the point of sale, storage, or other carbon management applications;

“Coal severing and processing” means activities resulting in the eligible company being subject to the tax imposed by KRS Chapter 143;

“Commonwealth” means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

“Confirmed approved costs” means:

For owned economic development projects, the documented eligible costs incurred on or before the activation date; or

For leased economic development projects:

The documented eligible costs incurred on or before the activation date; and

Estimated rent to be incurred by the approved company throughout the term of the tax incentive agreement.

“Department” means the Department of Revenue;

“Economic development project” means:

The acquisition, leasing, or construction of a new facility;

The acquisition, leasing, rehabilitation, or expansion of an existing facility; or

The installation and equipping of a facility;

“Eligible company” means any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship, business trust, or any other entity with a proposed economic development project that is engaged in or is planning to be engaged in one (1) or more of the following activities within the Commonwealth:
(17) (a)

“Eligible company” means any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship, business trust, or any other entity with a proposed economic development project that is engaged in or is planning to be engaged in one (1) or more of the following activities within the Commonwealth:

Manufacturing;

Agribusiness;

Nonretail service or technology;

Headquarters operations, regardless of the underlying business activity of the company;

Alternative fuel, gasification, energy-efficient alternative fuel, or renewable energy production;

Carbon dioxide transmission pipeline;

Coal severing and processing; or

Hospital operations.

“Eligible company” does not include companies where the primary activity to be conducted within the Commonwealth is forestry, fishing, the provision of utilities, construction, wholesale trade, retail trade, real estate, rental and leasing, educational services, accommodation and food services, or public administration services;

“Eligible costs” means:

For owned economic development projects:

Start-up costs;

Nonrecurring obligations incurred for labor and nonrecurring payments to contractors, subcontractors, builders, and materialmen in connection with the economic development project;

The cost of acquiring land or rights in land and any cost incidental thereto, including recording fees;

The cost of contract bonds and of insurance of all kinds that may be required or necessary for completion of an economic development project which is not paid by a contractor or otherwise provided for;

All costs of architectural and engineering services, including test borings, surveys, estimated plans and specifications, preliminary investigations, and supervision of construction, as well as for the performance of all the duties required for construction of the economic development project;

All costs which are required to be paid under the terms of any contract for the economic development project;

All costs incurred for construction activities, including site tests and inspections; subsurface site work; excavation; removal of structures, roadways, cemeteries, and other surface obstructions; filling, grading, and providing drainage and storm water retention; installation of utilities such as water, sewer, sewage treatment, gas, electric, communications, and similar facilities; off-site construction of utility extensions to the boundaries of the real estate; construction and installation of railroad spurs as needed to connect the economic development project to existing railways; or similar activities as the authority may determine necessary for construction of the economic development project; and

All other costs of a nature comparable to those described above; and

For leased economic development projects:

Start-up costs;

Building/leasehold improvements; and

Fifty percent (50%) of the estimated annual rent for each year of the tax incentive agreement.

“Employee benefits” means payments by an approved company for its full-time employees for health insurance, life insurance, dental insurance, vision insurance, defined benefits, 401(k), or similar plans;

“Energy-efficient alternative fuel production” means a Kentucky operation that produces for sale energy-efficient alternative fuels;

“Energy-efficient alternative fuels” means homogeneous fuels that:

Are produced from processes designed to densify feedstock coal, waste coal, or biomass resources; and

Have an energy content that is greater than the feedstock coal, waste coal, or biomass resource;

“Enhanced incentive counties” means counties certified by the authority pursuant to KRS 154.32-050;

“Final approval” means the action taken by the authority authorizing the eligible company to receive incentives under this subchapter;

“Full-time job” means a job held by a person who:
(24) (a)

“Full-time job” means a job held by a person who:

Is required to work a minimum of thirty-five (35) hours per week; and

Is subject to the Kentucky individual income tax imposed by KRS 141.020; or
2. a.

Is subject to the Kentucky individual income tax imposed by KRS 141.020; or

Works remotely away from the economic development project if the job meets all of the following conditions:

Is held by a Kentucky resident;

Was created as a result of the economic development project; and

The payroll of this job is expensed to the economic development project;

“Full-time job” does not include a job held by a resident of any state with a reciprocal agreement between the Commonwealth and the other state as described in KRS 141.070;

“Gasification process” means a process that converts any carbon-containing material into a synthesis gas composed primarily of carbon monoxide and hydrogen;

“Gasification production” means a Kentucky operation that primarily produces for sale:

Alternative transportation fuels;

Synthetic natural gas;

Chemicals;

Chemical feedstocks; or

Liquid fuels;

“Headquarters” means the principal office where the principal executives of the entity are located and from which other personnel, branches, affiliates, offices, or entities are controlled;

“Hospital” means a facility licensed by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services under KRS Chapter 216B for the operation of a hospital and the basic services provided by a hospital;

“Incentives” means the incentives available under this subchapter, as listed in KRS 154.32-020(3);

“Job target” means the annual average number of new full-time jobs that the approved company commits to create and maintain at the economic development project, which shall not be less than ten (10) new full-time jobs;

“Kentucky gross receipts” has the same meaning as in KRS 141.0401;

“Kentucky gross profits” has the same meaning as in KRS 141.0401;

“Lease agreement” means an agreement between an approved company and an unrelated entity conveying the right to use a facility, the terms of which reflect an arms’ length transaction. “Lease agreement” does not include a capital lease;

“Leased project” means an economic development project site occupied by an approved company pursuant to a lease agreement;

“Manufacturing” means any activity involving:

Processing, assembling, or production of any property, including the processing resulting in a change in the conditions of the property and any activity related to the processing, assembling, or production of property, together with the storage, warehousing, distribution, and related office facilities; or

Production of vital medications, personal protective equipment, or equipment necessary to produce personal protective equipment;

“Nonretail service or technology” means any activity where service or technology is provided predominantly outside the Commonwealth and designed to serve a multistate, national, or international market.
(36) (a)

“Nonretail service or technology” means any activity where service or technology is provided predominantly outside the Commonwealth and designed to serve a multistate, national, or international market.

“Nonretail service or technology” includes but is not limited to call centers, centralized administrative or processing centers, telephone or Internet sales order or processing centers, distribution or fulfillment centers, data processing centers, research and development facilities, and other similar activities;

“Owned project” means an economic development project owned in fee simple by the approved company or an affiliate, or possessed by the approved company or an affiliate pursuant to a capital lease;

“Personal protective equipment” means protective clothing, helmets, gloves, face shields, goggles, face masks, respirators, and other equipment designed to protect the user from injury or the spread of infection or illness;

“Preliminary approval” means the action taken by the authority preliminarily approving an eligible company for incentives under this subchapter;

“Renewable energy production” means a Kentucky operation that utilizes wind power, biomass resources, landfill methane gas, hydropower, solar power, or other similar renewable resources to generate electricity for sale to unrelated entities;

“Rent” means the actual annual rent or fee paid by an approved company under a lease agreement;

“Start-up costs” means nonrecurring costs incurred to furnish and equip a facility for an economic development project, including costs incurred for:

Computers, furnishings, office equipment, manufacturing equipment, and fixtures;

The relocation of out-of-state equipment; and

Cost of fixed telecommunications equipment;

“Synthetic natural gas” means the same thing as in KRS 152.715;

“Tax incentive agreement” means the agreement entered into pursuant to KRS 154.32-040 between the authority and an approved company;

“Term” means the period of time for which a tax incentive agreement may be in effect, which shall not exceed fifteen (15) years for an economic development project located in an enhanced incentive county, or ten (10) years for an economic development project not located in any other county;

“Vital medications” means any drug or biologic used to prevent or treat a serious life-threatening disease or medical condition for which there is no other available source with sufficient supply of that drug or biologic or alternative drug or biologic;

“Wage” means the per hour earnings of a full-time employee, including wages, tips, overtime, bonuses, and commissions, as reflected on the employee’s federal form W-2 wage and tax statement, but excludes employee benefits; and

“Wage target” means the average total hourly compensation amount, including the minimum wage and employee benefits, that the approved company commits to meet for all new full-time jobs created and maintained as a result of the economic development project, which shall not be less than:

One hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the federal minimum wage in enhanced incentive counties; or

One hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage in all other counties.

For both owned and leased economic development projects, “confirmed approved costs” may be less than approved costs, but shall not be more than approved costs;

by an eligible company. “Economic development project” does not include any economic development project that will result in the replacement of facilities existing in the Commonwealth, except as provided in KRS 154.32-060;

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, for economic development projects that are not in enhanced incentive counties, the cost of equipment eligible for recovery as an eligible cost shall not exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for each new full-time job created as of the activation date;

from coal, waste coal, coal-processing waste, or biomass resources, through a gasification process. The gasification production may produce electricity as a by-product if the primary function of the operations remains the production and sale of alternative transportation fuels, synthetic natural gas, chemicals, chemical feedstocks, or liquid fuels;

as certified to the authority in accordance with KRS 154.32-030;

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 9, effective June 26, 2009; 2013, ch. 134, § 16, effective June 25, 2013; 2018 ch. 199, § 33, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 185, § 118, effective June 29, 2021.

154.32-020.
Incentives to induce location of economic development projects in the Commonwealth — Purposes — Requirements — Summary of incentives available — Legislative findings.

The purposes of this subchapter are:

To provide incentives for eligible companies and to encourage the location or expansion of manufacturing facilities, agribusiness operations, nonretail service or technology facilities, headquarters operations, alternative fuel production facilities, gasification production facilities, energy-efficient alternative fuel production facilities, renewable energy production facilities, carbon dioxide transmission pipelines, coal severing and processing, and hospital operations in the Commonwealth to advance the public purposes of:

Creation of new jobs that, but for the incentives offered by the authority, would not exist within the Commonwealth;

Creation of new sources of tax revenues for the support of public services provided by the Commonwealth;

Improvement in the quality of life for Kentucky citizens through the creation of sustainable jobs with higher salaries; and

Providing an economic stimulus to bolster in-state production of vital medications and personal protective equipment; and

To provide enhanced incentives for companies that locate in enhanced incentive counties in recognition of the depressed economic conditions in those counties and the increased need for the growth and development caused by the depressed economic conditions.

To qualify for the incentives provided by subsection (3) of this section, an approved company shall:

Incur eligible costs of at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000);

Create at least ten (10) new full-time jobs and maintain an annual average number of at least ten (10) new full-time jobs; and

Pay at least ninety percent (90%) of all new full-time employees whose jobs were created as a result of the economic development project a minimum wage of at least one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the federal minimum wage in enhanced incentive counties, and one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage in other counties throughout the term of the economic development project; and
(c) 1.

Pay at least ninety percent (90%) of all new full-time employees whose jobs were created as a result of the economic development project a minimum wage of at least one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the federal minimum wage in enhanced incentive counties, and one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage in other counties throughout the term of the economic development project; and

Provide employee benefits for all new full-time jobs equal to at least fifteen percent (15%) of the minimum wage requirement established by subparagraph 1. of this paragraph. If the eligible company does not provide employee benefits equal to at least fifteen percent (15%) of the minimum wage requirement established by subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, the eligible company may still qualify for incentives if it provides the full-time employees hired as a result of the economic development project total hourly compensation equal to or greater than one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of the minimum wage requirement established in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph through increased hourly wages combined with employee benefits; or

Produce vital medications, personal protective equipment, or equipment necessary to produce personal protective equipment.

The incentives available under this subchapter are as follows:

Tax credits of up to one hundred percent (100%) of the Kentucky income tax imposed under KRS 141.020 or 141.040 and the limited liability entity tax imposed under KRS 141.0401 on the income, Kentucky gross profits, or Kentucky gross receipts of the approved company generated by or arising from the economic development project, as set forth in KRS 141.415 and 154.32-070;

Authorization for the approved company to impose a wage assessment against the gross wages of each new employee subject to the Kentucky income tax as provided in KRS 154.32-090; and

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for any economic development project with an eligible investment of more than two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000), the authority may authorize approval to the economic development project based upon terms and incentives applicable to economic development project locating in an enhanced incentive county.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that the authority granted in this subchapter and the purposes accomplished hereby are proper governmental and public purposes for which public moneys may be expended, and that the inducement of the location of economic development projects within the Commonwealth is of paramount importance to the economic well-being of the Commonwealth.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 10, effective June 26, 2009; 2018 ch. 199, § 34, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 172, § 3, effective March 26, 2019; 2021 ch. 185, § 119, effective June 29, 2021.

154.32-030.
Application, approval,
and review process — Memorandum of agreement — Preliminary and final approval — Tax incentive agreement — Standards for approval — Partial satisfaction of eligibility requirements.

The application, approval, and review process under this subchapter shall be as follows:

An eligible company with a proposed economic development project may submit an application to the authority. The application shall include the information required by subsection (3) of this section;

Upon review of the application and any additional information submitted, the authority may, by resolution, give preliminary approval to an eligible company and authorize the negotiation and execution of a memorandum of agreement. The memorandum of agreement shall establish a preliminary job target, minimum wage target, including employee benefits, and maximum total approved cost for the economic development project, and shall only allow the recovery of eligible costs incurred after preliminary approval. Upon preliminary approval, the preliminarily approved company may undertake the project in accordance with the memorandum of agreement, and may begin to hire employees that may be counted toward the minimum full-time job requirements established by the memorandum of agreement;

After preliminary approval but before final approval, the authority shall post the preliminarily approved company’s name, the location of the economic development project, and the incentives that have been preliminarily approved on the Cabinet for Economic Development’s Web site;

The preliminarily approved company shall submit any documentation required by the authority upon request of the authority;

To obtain final approval, the preliminarily approved company shall submit:

Documentation required by the authority to confirm that the requirements established by the memorandum of agreement have been met; and

Documentation of official action taken by a local governmental entity detailing the manner and level of local contribution, if applicable.

On or before the activation date, the approved company shall notify the authority of its intention to activate the tax incentive agreement. The approved company shall submit:
(f) 1.

On or before the activation date, the approved company shall notify the authority of its intention to activate the tax incentive agreement. The approved company shall submit:

Documentation that it has met the minimum full-time job, minimum investment, and minimum wage and employee benefits requirements established by KRS 154.32-020 as of the date of activation; and

The confirmed approved costs incurred as of the date of activation, which shall be the total eligible costs that may be recovered by the approved company.

If the approved company fails to meet any of the minimum investment, full-time job, or wage requirements, including employee benefits, established by KRS 154.32-020 on the activation date, the tax incentive agreement shall be canceled and the approved company shall not be eligible for incentives.

If an approved company meets the minimum investment, full-time job, and wage requirements, including employee benefits, established by KRS 154.32-020, but fails to meet higher job targets and minimum wage targets, including employee benefits, established in the tax incentive agreement, then the provisions of subsection (4) of this section shall apply in determining the incentives for which the approved company qualifies.

Upon activation of a tax incentive agreement, the authority shall notify the department, and shall provide the department with the information necessary to monitor and track the incentives taken by the approved company; and

The authority shall monitor the tax incentive agreement at least annually, and the approved company shall submit all documentation necessary for the authority to monitor the agreement.
(g) 1.

The authority shall monitor the tax incentive agreement at least annually, and the approved company shall submit all documentation necessary for the authority to monitor the agreement.

The authority shall, based on the documentation provided, confirm that the approved company is in continued compliance with the provisions of the tax incentive agreement and, therefore, eligible for incentives.

Upon annual review, if the approved company meets the minimum job and wage requirements, including employee benefits, established by KRS 154.32-020, but fails to meet the job target and minimum wage target, including employee benefits, established in the tax incentive agreement, then the provisions of subsection (4) of this section shall apply in determining the incentives for which the approved company qualifies in any year.

Upon final approval, the authority shall notify the department that an approved company is eligible for incentives and shall provide the department with the information necessary to monitor the use of incentives by the approved company. If, at any time during the term of the tax incentive agreement, an approved company becomes ineligible for incentives, the authority shall notify the department, and the department shall discontinue the availability of incentives for the approved company.

The authority may establish procedures and standards for the review and approval of eligible companies and their economic development projects through the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(2) (a)

The authority may establish procedures and standards for the review and approval of eligible companies and their economic development projects through the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

Standards to be used by the authority in reviewing and approving an eligible company and its economic development project shall include but not be limited to:

The creditworthiness of the eligible company;

The proposed capital investment to be made;

The number of new full-time jobs to be provided for the residents of the Commonwealth and the wages to be paid;

Support of the local community; and

The likelihood of the economic success of the economic development project.

The application shall include but not be limited to:

The name of the applicant and identification of any affiliates of the applicant who will have some relation to the economic development project;

A description of the economic development project, including its location, the total investment in the economic development project, and total proposed eligible costs;

The projected number of new full-time jobs to be created as a result of the economic development project and identification of any affiliates who may employ persons hired to fill those jobs;

The number of existing full-time jobs at the site of the economic development project on the date of the application and a description and breakdown of the relevant affiliated employers;

Proposed wage and employee benefit amounts for the new full-time jobs to be created as a result of the proposed economic development project;

For proposed economic development projects new to the Commonwealth, certification by the eligible company that the economic development project could reasonably and efficiently locate outside of the Commonwealth and, without the incentives offered by the authority, the eligible company would likely locate outside the Commonwealth;

For eligible companies with an existing location in the Commonwealth considering an expansion, certification that the tax incentives are necessary for the expansion to occur;

A letter of support from a local governmental entity in the city or county where the economic development project will be located; and

Any other information the authority may require.

An approved company that meets the minimum job and wage requirements, including employee benefits established by KRS 154.32-020, but fails to meet the job target and minimum wage target, including employee benefits established by the tax incentive agreement, shall be eligible to receive the incentives authorized by the tax incentive agreement as provided in this subsection.
(4) (a)

An approved company that meets the minimum job and wage requirements, including employee benefits established by KRS 154.32-020, but fails to meet the job target and minimum wage target, including employee benefits established by the tax incentive agreement, shall be eligible to receive the incentives authorized by the tax incentive agreement as provided in this subsection.

If, upon activation or annual review, an approved company achieves at least ninety percent (90%) of both the job target and minimum wage target, including employee benefits established by the tax incentive agreement, and no other default has occurred, then the approved company shall be eligible to receive full incentives as provided in the tax incentive agreement.

If, upon activation or annual review, an approved company achieves less than ninety percent (90%) of either the job target or minimum wage target, including employee benefits established in the tax incentive agreement, and no other default has occurred, then the incentives available to the approved company for the following year shall be reduced by a percentage equal to the percentage representing the difference between the job target or minimum wage target, including employee benefits established in the tax incentive agreement, and the actual average number of full-time jobs or average wage, including employee benefits, paid. If both the number of actual average full-time jobs and average wages paid, including employee benefits, are below ninety percent (90%) of the targets on the same measurement date, then the greater percentage reduction of the two (2) shall be applied rather than reducing the incentives available by the sum of the two (2).

If, upon annual review, either the actual number of new full-time jobs or the average wages paid for those jobs, including employee benefits, is less than the minimum requirements established by KRS 154.32-020, then the economic development project may be suspended automatically or, with approval of the authority, terminated.

Upon review and confirmation of the documentation, the authority may, by resolution, give final approval to the preliminarily approved company, and authorize the execution of a tax incentive agreement between the authority and the approved company pursuant to KRS 154.32-040. The tax incentive agreement shall establish an activation date, which shall be within two (2) years of final approval;

History.
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 11, effective June 26, 2009; 2019 ch. 172, § 4, effective March 26, 2019.

154.32-040.
Tax incentive agreement between authority and approved company — Contents.

The authority, upon final approval of a company, may enter into a tax incentive agreement with the approved company. The terms and conditions of the tax incentive agreement shall be negotiated between the authority and the approved company. The terms of the tax incentive agreement shall include but not be limited to the following provisions:

The maximum approved costs that may be recovered over the term of the tax incentive agreement and the annual maximum for approved costs;

That the approved company shall provide the authority with all documentation requested in a manner acceptable to the authority;

Identification of the contribution of the local government to the economic development project, if any;

The activation date, which shall be within two (2) years of final approval;

That the approved company shall implement the activation date by notifying the authority;

That the approved company shall provide documentation satisfactory to the authority within the timeframes required by the authority that it has met the minimum employment, minimum investment, and minimum wage requirements, including employee benefits, established by KRS 154.32-020;

That failure of the approved company to meet any of the minimum job, minimum investment, or minimum wage requirements, including employee benefits, established by KRS 154.32-020, on the activation date shall result in cancellation of the tax incentive agreement;

The term of the agreement, which shall not exceed fifteen (15) years for an economic development project located in an enhanced incentive county, or ten (10) years for an economic development project located in another county;

That, if confirmed approved costs are less than the maximum approved costs included in the tax incentive agreement, the confirmed approved costs shall become the maximum amount that may be recovered by the approved company;

If the economic development project is a leased project, that future rent payments that are included in eligible costs shall be included as confirmed approved costs upon submission of a valid lease agreement executed after preliminary approval;

Establishment of a job target and minimum wage target, including employee benefits;

A requirement that the job target and minimum wage target, including employee benefits, be measured:

On the activation date, against the actual new full-time jobs created and the average wages, including employee benefits, paid for those jobs; and

Annually during each year of the agreement, against the annual average of the new full-time jobs and the average wages paid for those jobs, including employee benefits;

A provision requiring the approved company to notify the authority immediately if the approved company sells or otherwise transfers or disposes of the land on which an economic development project is located, if a lease relating to the economic development project is terminated or lapses, or if the approved company ceases or fundamentally alters operations at the economic development project;

A provision detailing the reductions in incentives that will occur pursuant to KRS 154.32-030(4) if an approved company fails to meet its job target or minimum wage target, including employee benefits;

That the agreement may be assigned by the approved company upon the adoption of a resolution by the authority to that effect;

That the approved company shall make available to the authority all of its records pertaining to the economic development project, including but not limited to payroll records, records relating to eligible costs, and any other records pertaining to the economic development project that the authority may require;

That the authority may share information with the department for the purposes of monitoring and enforcing the terms of the tax incentive agreement;

That, if an approved company fails to comply with its obligations under the tax incentive agreement other than the jobs target or minimum wage target, the authority may take any or all of the following actions:

Suspend the incentives available to the approved company;

Terminate the incentives available to the approved company; or

Pursue any other remedy set forth in the tax incentive agreement or to which it may be entitled by law; and

Any other provisions not inconsistent with this subchapter and determined to be necessary or appropriate by the parties to the tax incentive agreement.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 12, effective June 26, 2009; 2021 ch. 185, § 120, effective June 29, 2021.